usr/share/texmf-texlive/tex/lambda/base/elhyph16.tex
%%% ====================================================================
%%%  @LaTeX-file{
%%%     author          = "Yannis Haralambous",
%%%     version         = "1",
%%%     date            = "1998-12-15"
%%%     time            = "11:40:00 MET"
%%%     filename        = "elhyph16.tex",
%%%     address         = "187, rue Nationale,
%%%                        59800 Lille, France"
%%%     telephone       = "+33 607981626",
%%%     FAX             = "+33 320402864",
%%%     checksum        = "",
%%%     email           = "yannis@fluxus-virus.com",
%%%     codetable       = "iso-8859-7",
%%%     keywords        = "omega, greek, unicode",
%%%     supported       = "yes",
%%%     docstring       = "\lefthyphenmin=2\righthyphenmin=2"
%%%  }
%%% ====================================================================
%%% THE FOLLOWING USES ISO 8859-7
%%% Αν μπορείς να το διαβάσεις αυτό, τότε όλα πάνε καλά
\ifx\OmegaVersion\undefinedcommand\else
% Greek Omega Hyphens 1997-05-02 (seven years later :-)
% 03ca est "i, 03cb est "u
%%% ====================================================================
%%%  @LaTeX-file{
%%%     author          = "Yannis Haralambous",
%%%     version         = "",
%%%     date            = "92-2-9"
%%%     time            = "8:7:0 MET"
%%%     filename        = "elhyphen.tex",
%%%     address         = "87, rue Nationale,
%%%                        900 Lille, France"
%%%     telephone       = "",
%%%     FAX             = "+3 0084",
%%%     checksum        = "",
%%%     email           = "Yannis.Haralambous@univ-lille1.fr",
%%%     codetable       = "7-bit Greek TeX encoding",
%%%     keywords        = "",
%%%     supported       = "yes",
%%%     docstring       = "\lefthyphenmin=1\righthyphenmin=1"
%%%  }
%%% ====================================================================
%This is file grhyph.tex
% These are the Modern Greek hyphenation patterns of ScholarTeX, as of
% 9 Feb 92 ,  8.7.
% History: This was part of the rgr-package version 1.1
%      as of   March 2, 90 Lille (France)
%
% Hyphenation patterns for modern greek language
% **********************************************
%
\def\greeklccodes{%
\catcode"0710=12 \lccode"0710=`\α
\catcode"0711=12 \lccode"0711=`\α
\catcode"0712=12 \lccode"0712=`\α
\catcode"0713=12 \lccode"0713=`\α
\catcode"0714=12 \lccode"0714=`\α
\catcode"0715=12 \lccode"0715=`\α
\catcode"0716=12 \lccode"0716=`\α
\catcode"0717=12 \lccode"0717=`\α
\catcode"0718=12 \lccode"0718=`\α
\catcode"0719=12 \lccode"0719=`\α
\catcode"071A=12 \lccode"071A=`\α
\catcode"071B=12 \lccode"071B=`\α
\catcode"071C=12 \lccode"071C=`\α
\catcode"071D=12 \lccode"071D=`\α
\catcode"071E=12 \lccode"071E=`\α
\catcode"071F=12 \lccode"071F=`\α
\catcode"0720=12 \lccode"0720=`\α
\catcode"0721=12 \lccode"0721=`\α
\catcode"0722=12 \lccode"0722=`\α
\catcode"0723=12 \lccode"0723=`\α
\catcode"0724=12 \lccode"0724=`\α
\catcode"0725=12 \lccode"0725=`\α
\catcode"0726=12 \lccode"0726=`\α
\catcode"0727=12 \lccode"0727=`\α
\catcode"0728=12 \lccode"0728=`\α
\catcode"0729=12 \lccode"0729=`\α
\catcode"072A=12 \lccode"072A=`\α
\catcode"072B=12 \lccode"072B=`\α
\catcode"072C=12 \lccode"072C=`\α
\catcode"072D=12 \lccode"072D=`\α
\catcode"072E=12 \lccode"072E=`\α
\catcode"072F=12 \lccode"072F=`\α
\catcode"07B0=12 \lccode"07B0=`\α
\catcode"07B8=12 \lccode"07B8=`\α
\catcode"07CD=12 \lccode"07CD=`\α
\catcode"07D0=12 \lccode"07D0=`\α
\catcode"07D1=12 \lccode"07D1=`\α
\catcode"07D2=12 \lccode"07D2=`\α
\catcode"0810=12 \lccode"0810=`\α
\catcode"0811=12 \lccode"0811=`\α
\catcode"0812=12 \lccode"0812=`\α
\catcode"0813=12 \lccode"0813=`\α
\catcode"0814=12 \lccode"0814=`\α
\catcode"0815=12 \lccode"0815=`\α
\catcode"0816=12 \lccode"0816=`\α
\catcode"0817=12 \lccode"0817=`\α
\catcode"0818=12 \lccode"0818=`\α
\catcode"0819=12 \lccode"0819=`\α
\catcode"081A=12 \lccode"081A=`\α
\catcode"081B=12 \lccode"081B=`\α
\catcode"081C=12 \lccode"081C=`\α
\catcode"081D=12 \lccode"081D=`\α
\catcode"081E=12 \lccode"081E=`\α
\catcode"081F=12 \lccode"081F=`\α
\catcode"0820=12 \lccode"0820=`\α
\catcode"0821=12 \lccode"0821=`\α
\catcode"0822=12 \lccode"0822=`\α
\catcode"0823=12 \lccode"0823=`\α
\catcode"0824=12 \lccode"0824=`\α
\catcode"0825=12 \lccode"0825=`\α
\catcode"0826=12 \lccode"0826=`\α
\catcode"0827=12 \lccode"0827=`\α
\catcode"0828=12 \lccode"0828=`\α
\catcode"0829=12 \lccode"0829=`\α
\catcode"082A=12 \lccode"082A=`\α
\catcode"082B=12 \lccode"082B=`\α
\catcode"082C=12 \lccode"082C=`\α
\catcode"082D=12 \lccode"082D=`\α
\catcode"0910=12 \lccode"0910=`\α
\catcode"0911=12 \lccode"0911=`\α
\catcode"0912=12 \lccode"0912=`\α
\catcode"0913=12 \lccode"0913=`\α
\catcode"0914=12 \lccode"0914=`\α
\catcode"0915=12 \lccode"0915=`\α
\catcode"0916=12 \lccode"0916=`\α
\catcode"0917=12 \lccode"0917=`\α
\catcode"0918=12 \lccode"0918=`\α
\catcode"0919=12 \lccode"0919=`\α
\catcode"091A=12 \lccode"091A=`\α
\catcode"091B=12 \lccode"091B=`\α
\catcode"091C=12 \lccode"091C=`\α
\catcode"091D=12 \lccode"091D=`\α
\catcode"091E=12 \lccode"091E=`\α
\catcode"091F=12 \lccode"091F=`\α
\catcode"0920=12 \lccode"0920=`\α
\catcode"0921=12 \lccode"0921=`\α
\catcode"0922=12 \lccode"0922=`\α
\catcode"0923=12 \lccode"0923=`\α
\catcode"0924=12 \lccode"0924=`\α
\catcode"0925=12 \lccode"0925=`\α
\catcode"0926=12 \lccode"0926=`\α
\catcode"0927=12 \lccode"0927=`\α
\catcode"0928=12 \lccode"0928=`\α
\catcode"0929=12 \lccode"0929=`\α
\catcode"092A=12 \lccode"092A=`\α
\catcode"092B=12 \lccode"092B=`\α
\catcode"092C=12 \lccode"092C=`\α
\catcode"092D=12 \lccode"092D=`\α
\catcode"0730=12 \lccode"0730=`\ε
\catcode"0731=12 \lccode"0731=`\ε
\catcode"0732=12 \lccode"0732=`\ε
\catcode"0733=12 \lccode"0733=`\ε
\catcode"0734=12 \lccode"0734=`\ε
\catcode"0735=12 \lccode"0735=`\ε
\catcode"0736=12 \lccode"0736=`\ε
\catcode"0737=12 \lccode"0737=`\ε
\catcode"0738=12 \lccode"0738=`\ε
\catcode"0739=12 \lccode"0739=`\ε
\catcode"073A=12 \lccode"073A=`\ε
\catcode"073B=12 \lccode"073B=`\ε
\catcode"073C=12 \lccode"073C=`\ε
\catcode"073D=12 \lccode"073D=`\ε
\catcode"073E=12 \lccode"073E=`\ε
\catcode"073F=12 \lccode"073F=`\ε
\catcode"07B1=12 \lccode"07B1=`\ε
\catcode"07B9=12 \lccode"07B9=`\ε
\catcode"0830=12 \lccode"0830=`\ε
\catcode"0831=12 \lccode"0831=`\ε
\catcode"0832=12 \lccode"0832=`\ε
\catcode"0833=12 \lccode"0833=`\ε
\catcode"0834=12 \lccode"0834=`\ε
\catcode"0835=12 \lccode"0835=`\ε
\catcode"0836=12 \lccode"0836=`\ε
\catcode"0837=12 \lccode"0837=`\ε
\catcode"0838=12 \lccode"0838=`\ε
\catcode"0839=12 \lccode"0839=`\ε
\catcode"083A=12 \lccode"083A=`\ε
\catcode"083B=12 \lccode"083B=`\ε
\catcode"083C=12 \lccode"083C=`\ε
\catcode"083D=12 \lccode"083D=`\ε
\catcode"0930=12 \lccode"0930=`\ε
\catcode"0931=12 \lccode"0931=`\ε
\catcode"0932=12 \lccode"0932=`\ε
\catcode"0933=12 \lccode"0933=`\ε
\catcode"0934=12 \lccode"0934=`\ε
\catcode"0935=12 \lccode"0935=`\ε
\catcode"0936=12 \lccode"0936=`\ε
\catcode"0937=12 \lccode"0937=`\ε
\catcode"0938=12 \lccode"0938=`\ε
\catcode"0939=12 \lccode"0939=`\ε
\catcode"093A=12 \lccode"093A=`\ε
\catcode"093B=12 \lccode"093B=`\ε
\catcode"093C=12 \lccode"093C=`\ε
\catcode"093D=12 \lccode"093D=`\ε
\catcode"0740=12 \lccode"0740=`\η
\catcode"0741=12 \lccode"0741=`\η
\catcode"0742=12 \lccode"0742=`\η
\catcode"0743=12 \lccode"0743=`\η
\catcode"0744=12 \lccode"0744=`\η
\catcode"0745=12 \lccode"0745=`\η
\catcode"0746=12 \lccode"0746=`\η
\catcode"0747=12 \lccode"0747=`\η
\catcode"0748=12 \lccode"0748=`\η
\catcode"0749=12 \lccode"0749=`\η
\catcode"074A=12 \lccode"074A=`\η
\catcode"074B=12 \lccode"074B=`\η
\catcode"074C=12 \lccode"074C=`\η
\catcode"074D=12 \lccode"074D=`\η
\catcode"074E=12 \lccode"074E=`\η
\catcode"074F=12 \lccode"074F=`\η
\catcode"0750=12 \lccode"0750=`\η
\catcode"0751=12 \lccode"0751=`\η
\catcode"0752=12 \lccode"0752=`\η
\catcode"0753=12 \lccode"0753=`\η
\catcode"0754=12 \lccode"0754=`\η
\catcode"0755=12 \lccode"0755=`\η
\catcode"0756=12 \lccode"0756=`\η
\catcode"0757=12 \lccode"0757=`\η
\catcode"0758=12 \lccode"0758=`\η
\catcode"0759=12 \lccode"0759=`\η
\catcode"075A=12 \lccode"075A=`\η
\catcode"075B=12 \lccode"075B=`\η
\catcode"075C=12 \lccode"075C=`\η
\catcode"075D=12 \lccode"075D=`\η
\catcode"075E=12 \lccode"075E=`\η
\catcode"075F=12 \lccode"075F=`\η
\catcode"07B2=12 \lccode"07B2=`\η
\catcode"07BA=12 \lccode"07BA=`\η
\catcode"07CE=12 \lccode"07CE=`\η
\catcode"07D3=12 \lccode"07D3=`\η
\catcode"07D4=12 \lccode"07D4=`\η
\catcode"07D5=12 \lccode"07D5=`\η
\catcode"0840=12 \lccode"0840=`\η
\catcode"0841=12 \lccode"0841=`\η
\catcode"0842=12 \lccode"0842=`\η
\catcode"0843=12 \lccode"0843=`\η
\catcode"0844=12 \lccode"0844=`\η
\catcode"0845=12 \lccode"0845=`\η
\catcode"0846=12 \lccode"0846=`\η
\catcode"0847=12 \lccode"0847=`\η
\catcode"0848=12 \lccode"0848=`\η
\catcode"0849=12 \lccode"0849=`\η
\catcode"084A=12 \lccode"084A=`\η
\catcode"084B=12 \lccode"084B=`\η
\catcode"084C=12 \lccode"084C=`\η
\catcode"084D=12 \lccode"084D=`\η
\catcode"084E=12 \lccode"084E=`\η
\catcode"084F=12 \lccode"084F=`\η
\catcode"0850=12 \lccode"0850=`\η
\catcode"0851=12 \lccode"0851=`\η
\catcode"0852=12 \lccode"0852=`\η
\catcode"0853=12 \lccode"0853=`\η
\catcode"0854=12 \lccode"0854=`\η
\catcode"0855=12 \lccode"0855=`\η
\catcode"0856=12 \lccode"0856=`\η
\catcode"0857=12 \lccode"0857=`\η
\catcode"0858=12 \lccode"0858=`\η
\catcode"0859=12 \lccode"0859=`\η
\catcode"085A=12 \lccode"085A=`\η
\catcode"085B=12 \lccode"085B=`\η
\catcode"085C=12 \lccode"085C=`\η
\catcode"085D=12 \lccode"085D=`\η
\catcode"0940=12 \lccode"0940=`\η
\catcode"0941=12 \lccode"0941=`\η
\catcode"0942=12 \lccode"0942=`\η
\catcode"0943=12 \lccode"0943=`\η
\catcode"0944=12 \lccode"0944=`\η
\catcode"0945=12 \lccode"0945=`\η
\catcode"0946=12 \lccode"0946=`\η
\catcode"0947=12 \lccode"0947=`\η
\catcode"0948=12 \lccode"0948=`\η
\catcode"0949=12 \lccode"0949=`\η
\catcode"094A=12 \lccode"094A=`\η
\catcode"094B=12 \lccode"094B=`\η
\catcode"094C=12 \lccode"094C=`\η
\catcode"094D=12 \lccode"094D=`\η
\catcode"094E=12 \lccode"094E=`\η
\catcode"094F=12 \lccode"094F=`\η
\catcode"0950=12 \lccode"0950=`\η
\catcode"0951=12 \lccode"0951=`\η
\catcode"0952=12 \lccode"0952=`\η
\catcode"0953=12 \lccode"0953=`\η
\catcode"0954=12 \lccode"0954=`\η
\catcode"0955=12 \lccode"0955=`\η
\catcode"0956=12 \lccode"0956=`\η
\catcode"0957=12 \lccode"0957=`\η
\catcode"0958=12 \lccode"0958=`\η
\catcode"0959=12 \lccode"0959=`\η
\catcode"095A=12 \lccode"095A=`\η
\catcode"095B=12 \lccode"095B=`\η
\catcode"095C=12 \lccode"095C=`\η
\catcode"095D=12 \lccode"095D=`\η
\catcode"0760=12 \lccode"0760=`\ι
\catcode"0761=12 \lccode"0761=`\ι
\catcode"0762=12 \lccode"0762=`\ι
\catcode"0763=12 \lccode"0763=`\ι
\catcode"0764=12 \lccode"0764=`\ι
\catcode"0765=12 \lccode"0765=`\ι
\catcode"0766=12 \lccode"0766=`\ι
\catcode"0767=12 \lccode"0767=`\ι
\catcode"0768=12 \lccode"0768=`\ι
\catcode"0769=12 \lccode"0769=`\ι
\catcode"076A=12 \lccode"076A=`\ι
\catcode"076B=12 \lccode"076B=`\ι
\catcode"076C=12 \lccode"076C=`\ι
\catcode"076D=12 \lccode"076D=`\ι
\catcode"076E=12 \lccode"076E=`\ι
\catcode"076F=12 \lccode"076F=`\ι
\catcode"07B3=12 \lccode"07B3=`\ι
\catcode"07C0=12 \lccode"07C0=`\ι
\catcode"07C1=12 \lccode"07C1=`\ι
\catcode"07C2=12 \lccode"07C2=`\ι
\catcode"07C3=12 \lccode"07C3=`\ι
\catcode"0830=12 \lccode"0830=`\ι
\catcode"0831=12 \lccode"0831=`\ι
\catcode"0832=12 \lccode"0832=`\ι
\catcode"0833=12 \lccode"0833=`\ι
\catcode"0834=12 \lccode"0834=`\ι
\catcode"0835=12 \lccode"0835=`\ι
\catcode"0836=12 \lccode"0836=`\ι
\catcode"0837=12 \lccode"0837=`\ι
\catcode"0838=12 \lccode"0838=`\ι
\catcode"0839=12 \lccode"0839=`\ι
\catcode"083A=12 \lccode"083A=`\ι
\catcode"083B=12 \lccode"083B=`\ι
\catcode"083C=12 \lccode"083C=`\ι
\catcode"083D=12 \lccode"083D=`\ι
\catcode"0930=12 \lccode"0930=`\ι
\catcode"0931=12 \lccode"0931=`\ι
\catcode"0932=12 \lccode"0932=`\ι
\catcode"0933=12 \lccode"0933=`\ι
\catcode"0934=12 \lccode"0934=`\ι
\catcode"0935=12 \lccode"0935=`\ι
\catcode"0936=12 \lccode"0936=`\ι
\catcode"0937=12 \lccode"0937=`\ι
\catcode"0938=12 \lccode"0938=`\ι
\catcode"0939=12 \lccode"0939=`\ι
\catcode"093A=12 \lccode"093A=`\ι
\catcode"093B=12 \lccode"093B=`\ι
